District of Columbia statutes.
9-1117.02

State Troopers and local law enforcement officers authority.

The Parties hereby give one another all necessary power and authority to have their respective state troopers or local law enforcement officers direct traffic and authorize the removal of disabled or abandoned vehicles, trailers, semitrailers or the parts or contents thereof, from any part of the Potomac River Bridges, to the same extent and in the same manner that such troopers and local law enforcement officers may exercise such authority in their own jurisdictions. No Party, acting through its troopers or local law enforcement officers, shall have the authority to direct or authorize the towing or removal of any vehicle or other thing to a destination outside its own jurisdiction, unless the consent of an officer or trooper of the destination jurisdiction has first been obtained.

History

March 31, 2000, D.C. Law 13-63, § 3, 46 DCR 9217

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) authorization of the District to remove disabled vehicles from any portion of the Potomac River Bridges, see notes following § 9-1117.01.